Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 309.364 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, KRS 309.350 to 309.364
supersede all ordinances or regulations regulating massage therapists in any city,
county, urban-county, unified local governments, charter county, or consolidated
local government.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted or construed to limit the authority of
cities, counties, urban-county governments, consolidated local governments,
unified local governments, or charter county governments from regulating the
operation of businesses that are, or advertise to be, owned, operated, associated,
or affiliated with a licensed massage therapist, including the authority to adopt
and enforce ordinances or regulations relating to:
(a) Zoning requirements;
(b) Local business or occupational licensing requirements and standards;
(c) Occupational license fee; or
(d) Inspection, advertising, hours of operation, and sanitation
requirements[This article does not affect city, county, urban-county, charter
county, or consolidated local government regulations relating to zoning
requirements or occupational license fees pertaining to health care
professions].
Section 2. KRS 309.3535 is amended to read as follows:
Any person who violates KRS 309.353 shall be guilty of a Class A[B] misdemeanor.
Each massage performed without a license shall constitute a separate offense.
Page 1 of 1
BR164400.100 - 1644 - XXXX 2/6/2026 9:50 AM Jacketed